Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3308
Registration fee; renewal fee.

(1) An application for registration or renewal of registration under section 25-3307 shall be accompanied by either an application for registration fee or a renewal of registration fee, as applicable.

(2) The Secretary of State may, by rule and regulation, establish fees for applications for registration and renewals of registration at rates sufficient to cover the costs of administering the Nonrecourse Civil Litigation Act, in the event any such fees are required. Such fees shall be collected by the Secretary of State and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 2010, LB1094, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 10.